Nevada, session 83, SB156.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 228 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 12, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 12, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3 to 6, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed
to them in those sections.
Secs. 3 and 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4.5. “Local law enforcement agency” means:
1. The sheriff’s office of a county;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. A metropolitan police department; or
3. A police department of an incorporated city.
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5.5. “Special Counsel” means Special Counsel for the
Prevention of Gun Violence appointed pursuant to section 7 of
this act.
Sec. 6. “State agency” means an agency, bureau, board,
commission, department, division or any other unit of the
Executive Department of the State Government.
Sec. 7. 1. The Attorney General shall appoint a Special
Counsel for the Prevention of Gun Violence, who shall serve at
the pleasure of the Attorney General.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4 of section 8 of
this act, each state agency may cooperate with and assist the
Special Counsel in the performance of his or her duties and
functions.
Sec. 8. The Special Counsel shall:
1. Advise the Attorney General on all matters related to the
prevention of gun violence, including, without limitation, the
effectiveness of state laws in preventing gun violence, the legal,
social and policy barriers to preventing gun violence and
strategies and policies to prevent gun violence.
2. Collaborate with and assist professors and researchers in:
(a) Promoting new and relevant research relating to
preventing gun violence; and
(b) Researching, developing and implementing programs,
initiatives, tools and resources aimed at preventing gun violence.
3. At the request of the Attorney General, provide assistance
to other educational campaigns and programs conducted by the
Office of the Attorney General relating to the prevention of gun
violence, firearm safety and suicide prevention.
4. Collect data relating to any arrest or prosecution for a
violation of NRS 202.3625 to 202.3645, inclusive. Upon request of
the Special Counsel, the Department of Public Safety, a local law
enforcement agency, a district attorney or a city attorney shall
provide such data to the Special Counsel.
Sec. 9. 1. The Special Counsel may, within the limits of
money available for this purpose, establish and administer a
program to award grants to organizations in this State to conduct
gun violence prevention initiatives that are community-based,
culturally competent and focused on interrupting cycles of gun
violence, trauma and retaliation.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
2. The Attorney General may adopt regulations for the
administration of any grant program established pursuant to
subsection 1, including, without limitation, the procedure to apply
for such a grant, the criteria for awarding a grant and any
reporting requirements.
3. To be eligible for a grant from a program established
pursuant to subsection 1, an organization must comply with any
regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 2 and demonstrate to
the satisfaction of the Special Counsel that the organization has
the ability to conduct effective gun violence prevention initiatives
in communities identified by the Special Counsel as being at high
risk of perpetrating or being victimized by gun violence.
4. Any initiative conducted with a grant awarded by the
program established pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Use strategies that are evidence-informed and have
demonstrated the potential to reduce gun violence without
contributing to mass incarceration, such as hospital-based
violence intervention programs, group violence interventions,
evidence-based street outreach programs and violence interruption
and crisis management programs; and
(b) Include regular evaluations of the effectiveness of
implemented initiatives, which must include soliciting community
input.
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. The Special Counsel may apply for and receive gifts,
grants, contributions or other money from governmental and
private agencies, affiliated associations and other persons for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 7 to 12,
inclusive, of this act and to defray expenses incurred by the
Special Counsel in the discharge of his or her duties.
Sec. 12. On or before January 1 of each odd-numbered year,
the Attorney General shall submit to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the next regular session of the
Legislature a written report concerning:
1. The implementation of sections 7 to 12, inclusive, of this
act; and
2. The overall state of gun violence and gun violence
prevention in this State.
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Sec. 14.5. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 15. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)